apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="aband/oar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oï</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaríem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oariam</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaria</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oariái</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaríetz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oariatz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaries</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oariás</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarien</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarián</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarie</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oariá</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaram</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarè</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarai</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaratz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaretz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaràs</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaràn</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oarà</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oant</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oant</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oèrem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oè</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oèretz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oès</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oères</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oèren</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oèc</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oegam</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oésquem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oegam</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oésquem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oatz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oatz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oa</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oa</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__sigues"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oen</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oen</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oe</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oe</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cante"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oar</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oar</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oà</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__ac"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oà</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oàuem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oàvem</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaua</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oavi</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oàuetz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oàvetz</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaues</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oavas</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oauen</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oavan</l> 
        <r>oar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oaue</l> 

    <e lm="abandoar">
        <i>aband</i> 
        <par n="aband/oar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="coar">
        <i>c</i> 
        <par n="aband/oar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="empresoar" a="carmentano">
        <i>empres</i> 
        <par n="aband/oar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="esdejoar">
        <i>esdej</i> 
        <par n="aband/oar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="modelhoar">
        <i>modelh</i> 
        <par n="aband/oar__vblex"/> 
    </e>
